Utah statutes.
16-15-106.   Powers.

(1)  A business trust registered under this chapter may in its trust name:

(a)  sue;

(b)  subject to the limitations in the declaration of trust, acquire title, lease, mortgage, convey or otherwise deal with real and personal property, or any interest in real and personal property.

(2) (a)  A business trust may not maintain any action, suit, or proceeding in this state unless the business trust is registered under this chapter.

(b)  A business trust may be sued whether or not the business trust is registered under this chapter.

